Mississippi, session 2026, SB2393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following highways, roads or streets located in the State of Mississippi are hereby designated as an official Mississippi Scenic Byway to be known as the "Davis Lake Road Scenic Byway" pursuant to Section 65-41-1 et seq.: Beginning at the intersection of Mississippi Highway 15 and County Road 124 in Chickasaw County and traveling east and northeast along County Road 124 to the intersection of County Road 124 and County Road 413; then traveling southeast and east along County Road 413 and continuing through the point at which County Road 413 becomes County Road 134; then traveling southeast and east along County Road 134 to the intersection of County Road 134 and Mississippi Highway 41 in Chickasaw County.  The Davis Lake Road Scenic Byway runs approximately twelve and thirty-two hundredths (12.32) miles within Chickasaw County in Mississippi. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.